en: Costumes
xx: Costumes
cs: Kostýmy
da: Kostumer
de: Kostüme & Verkleidungen
es: Vestuario
fr: Déguisements
it: Costumi
ja: コスチューム衣装
nl: Kostuums
no: Kostymer
pl: Przebrania
pt: Fantasias
ru: Маскарадные костюмы
sv: Maskeradkostymer
tr: Kostümler

en: Masks
xx: Masks
cs: Masky
da: Masker
de: Masken
es: Máscaras
fr: Masques
it: Maschere
ja: 仮面
nl: Maskers
no: Masker
pl: Maski
pt: Máscaras
ru: Маски
sv: Masker
tr: Maskeler

en: Handbag & Wallet Accessories
xx: Handbag & Wallet Accessories
cs: Doplňky ke kabelkám a peněženkám
da: Tilbehør til håndtasker og pengepunge
de: Handtaschen & Geldbörsenaccessoires
es: Accesorios para bolsos y billeteras
fr: Accessoires pour sacs à main et portefeuilles
it: Accessori per borsette e portafogli
ja: ハンドバッグ・財布用小物
nl: Accessoires voor handtassen en portefeuilles
no: Håndveske- og lommeboktilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do torebek i portfeli
pt: Acessórios para bolsas e carteiras
ru: Принадлежности для ручных сумок и кошельков
sv: Accessoarer till handväskor och plånböcker
tr: El Çantası ve Cüzdan Aksesuarları

en: Checkbook Covers
xx: Checkbook Covers
cs: Pouzdra na šekové knížky
da: Checkhæfteholdere
de: Scheckheftetuis
es: Fundas para talonarios
fr: Protège-chéquiers
it: Portassegni
ja: 小切手帳カバー
nl: Chequeboekomslagen
no: Sjekkhefte-omslag
pl: Okładki na książeczki czekowe
pt: Capas para talões de cheques
ru: Обложки для чековых книжек
sv: Omslag för checkhäften
tr: Çek Defteri Kılıfları

en: Keychains
xx: Keychains
cs: Přívěsky na klíče
da: Nøgleringe
de: Schlüsselanhänger
es: Llaveros
fr: Porte-clés
it: Portachiavi
ja: キーチェーン
nl: Sleutelhangers
no: Nøkkelringer
pl: Breloczki
pt: Chaveiros
ru: Брелоки для ключей
sv: Nyckelringar
tr: Anahtarlık Halkaları

en: Lanyards
xx: Lanyards
cs: Šňůrky na krk
da: Halssnore
de: Tragebänder
es: Cintas
fr: Cordons
it: Cordini
ja: ネックストラップ
nl: Sleutelkoorden
no: Bæresnorer
pl: Smycze
pt: Correias de pescoço
ru: Ремешки
sv: Snoddar
tr: Boyun Askıları

en: Wallet Chains
xx: Wallet Chains
cs: Řetízky k peněženkám
da: Kæder til pengepunge
de: Brieftaschenketten
es: Cadenas de bolsillo
fr: Chaînes pour portefeuille
it: Catene per portafogli
ja: ウォレットチェーン
nl: Portefeuillekettingen
no: Lommebok-lenker
pl: Łańcuchy do portfela
pt: Correntes de carteira
ru: Цепи для кошельков
sv: Plånbokskedjor
tr: Cüzdan Zincirleri

en: Handbags\, Wallets & Cases
xx: Handbags\, Wallets & Cases
cs: Kabelky\, peněženky a pouzdra
da: Håndtasker\, pengepunge og holdere
de: Handtaschen\, Geldbörsen & Etuis
es: Bolsos\, billeteras y estuches
fr: Sacs à main\, portefeuilles et étuis
it: Borsette\, portafogli e custodie
ja: ハンドバッグ・財布
nl: Handtassen\, portefeuilles en koffers
no: Håndvesker\, lommebøker og omslag
pl: Torebki\, portfele i etui
pt: Bolsas\, carteiras e estojos
ru: Ручные сумки\, кошельки и чехлы
sv: Handväskor\, plånböcker och fodral
tr: El Çantaları\, Cüzdanlar ve Çantalar

en: Badge & Pass Holders
xx: Badge & Pass Holders
cs: Držáky a pouzdra na odznaky a průkazky
da: Badges og adgangskortholdere
de: Ausweistaschen
es: Colgadores para pases e insignias
fr: Étuis pour badges et insignes
it: Portabadge e portacartellino
ja: パスケース・IDホルダー
nl: Badge- en pashouders
no: ID-holdere
pl: Kieszonki na identyfikatory i przepustki
pt: Porta-crachás
ru: Держатели для бейджей и пропусков
sv: Fodral för pass och ID-kort
tr: Kimlik ve Paso Kılıfları

en: Business Card Cases
xx: Business Card Cases
cs: Pouzdra na vizitky
da: Visitkortholdere
de: Visitenkartenetuis
es: Estuches para tarjetas de visita
fr: Étuis pour cartes de visite
it: Custodie per biglietti da visita
ja: 名刺入れ
nl: Visitekaartmapjes
no: Visittkortetuier
pl: Etui na wizytówki
pt: Estojos para cartões de visita
ru: Ящики для визиток
sv: Visitkortsfodral
tr: Kartvizit Kılıfları

en: Handbags
xx: Handbags
cs: Kabelky
da: Håndtasker
de: Handtaschen
es: Bolsos
fr: Sacs à main, Sac à main en cuir
it: Borsette
ja: ハンドバッグ
nl: Handtassen
no: Håndvesker
pl: Torebki
pt: Bolsas
ru: Дамские ручные сумки
sv: Handväskor
tr: El Çantaları

en: Wallets & Money Clips
xx: Wallets & Money Clips
cs: Peněženky a sponky na peníze
da: Pengeclips
de: Geldbeutel & Geldklammern
es: Billeteras y clips para billetes
fr: Portefeuilles et pinces à billets, Portefeuille en cuir
it: Portafogli e portabanconote
ja: 財布・マネークリップ
nl: Portefeuilles en geldclips
no: Lommebøker og pengeklyper
pl: Portfele i spinki na banknoty
pt: Carteiras e clipes de dinheiro
ru: Кошельки и зажимы для денег
sv: Plånböcker och sedelklämmor
tr: Cüzdanlar ve Para Klipsleri

en: Jewelry
xx: Jewelry
cs: Klenoty
da: Smykker
de: Schmuck
es: Joyería
fr: Bijoux, Bijou
it: Preziosi
ja: ジュエリー
nl: Sieraden
no: Smykker
pl: Biżuteria
pt: Joias
ru: Ювелирные украшения
sv: Smycken
tr: Mücevherler

en: Anklets
xx: Anklets
cs: Nákotníky
da: Ankelringe
de: Fußkettchen
es: Tobilleras
fr: Bracelets de cheville
it: Cavigliere
ja: アンクレット
nl: Enkelbandjes
no: Ankelringer
pl: Biżuteria na kostki
pt: Tornozeleiras
ru: Браслеты для ног
sv: Vristkedjor
tr: Halhallar

en: Body Jewelry
xx: Body Jewelry
cs: Šperky na tělo
da: Kropssmykker
de: Körperschmuck
es: Joyas para piercings
fr: Bijoux pour le corps
it: Gioielli per il corpo
ja: ボディピアス
nl: Lichaamssieraden
no: Kroppssmykker
pl: Biżuteria do ciała
pt: Joias para o corpo
ru: Украшения для пирсинга
sv: Kroppssmycken
tr: Vücut Takıları

en: Bracelets
xx: Bracelets
cs: Náramky
da: Armsmykker
de: Armbänder
es: Pulseras
fr: Bracelets, Bracelet (bijou), Bracelet en cuir
it: Bracciali
ja: ブレスレット
nl: Armbanden
no: Armbånd
pl: Bransoletki
pt: Pulseiras
ru: Браслеты
sv: Armband
tr: Bilezikler

en: Brooches & Lapel Pins
xx: Brooches & Lapel Pins
cs: Brože a odznaky
da: Brocher og reverssmykker
de: Broschen und Anstecknadeln
es: Broches y alfileres
fr: Broches et épinglettes
it: Spille e spillette
ja: ブローチ・バッジ
nl: Broches en reversspelden
no: Brosjer og nålmerker
pl: Broszki i przypinki
pt: Broches e alfinetes de lapela
ru: Броши и значки
sv: Broscher och bröstnålar
tr: Broşlar ve Klapalar

en: Charms & Pendants
xx: Charms & Pendants
cs: Přívěsky
da: Amuletter og vedhæng
de: Charms & Anhänger
es: Colgantes y dijes
fr: Breloques et pendentifs
it: Ciondoli e pendenti
ja: チャーム・ペンダント
nl: Bedeltjes en hangertjes
no: Amuletter og anheng
pl: Zawieszki i wisiorki
pt: Amuletos e pingentes
ru: Подвески и брелоки
sv: Berlocker och hängsmycken
tr: Nazarlıklar ve Pandantifler

en: Earrings
xx: Earrings
cs: Náušnice
da: Øreringe
de: Ohrringe
es: Pendientes
fr: Boucles d'oreilles
it: Orecchini
ja: ピアス・イヤリング
nl: Oorbellen
no: Øreringer
pl: Kolczyki
pt: Brincos
ru: Серьги
sv: Örhängen
tr: Küpeler

en: Jewelry Sets
xx: Jewelry Sets
cs: Sady šperků
da: Smykkesæt
de: Schmucksets
es: Conjuntos de joyas
fr: Parures de bijoux
it: Set gioielli
ja: ジュエリーセット
nl: Sieradensets
no: Smykkesett
pl: Komplety biżuterii
pt: Conjuntos de joias
ru: Ювелирные наборы
sv: Smyckesuppsättningar
tr: Mücevher Setleri